Tennessee statutes. Title 42 Aeronautics
Part 2

Joint Operations

42-5-201. Joint operations authorized.

As used in this part, unless the context otherwise requires:

“Governing body” means the governing body of a county or municipality and the head of the agency if the public agency is other than a county or municipality; and

“Public agency” includes a municipality, as defined in this chapter, any agency of the state government and of the United States, and any municipality, political subdivision and agency of another state.

All powers, privileges and authority granted to any municipality by this chapter may be exercised and enjoyed jointly with any public agency of this state, and jointly with any public agency of any other state or of the United States to the extent that the laws of the other state or of the United States permit such joint exercise or enjoyment.

If not otherwise authorized by law, any agency of the state government, when acting jointly with any municipality, may exercise and enjoy all of the powers, privileges and authority conferred by this chapter upon a municipality.

Acts 1957, ch. 375, § 16; T.C.A., § 42-321.

Cross-References. Contracts and mutual aid agreements, §6-54-601.

Loans for airports, title 4, ch. 31, part 6.

Mutual aid agreements, §6-54-307.

42-5-202. Agreement as to joint operation.

Any two (2) or more public agencies may enter into agreements with each other for joint action pursuant to this part. Concurrent action by ordinance, resolution or otherwise of the governing bodies of the participating public agencies shall constitute joint action.

Each such agreement shall specify its duration, the proportionate interest that each public agency shall have in the property, facilities, and privileges involved, the proportion to be borne by each public agency of preliminary costs and costs of acquisition, establishment, construction, enlargement, improvement, and equipment of the airport or air navigation facility, the proportion of the expenses of maintenance, operation, regulation and protection thereof to be borne by each, and such other terms as are required by this section.

The agreement may also provide for:

Amendments thereof, and conditions and methods of termination of the agreement;

The disposal of all or any of the property, facilities and privileges jointly owned, prior to or upon the property, facilities and privileges, or any part thereof, ceasing to be used for the purposes provided in this chapter, or upon any such disposal, and of any funds or other property jointly owned and undisposed of;

The assumption or payment of any indebtedness arising from the joint venture that remains unpaid upon the disposal of all assets or upon a termination of the agreement; and

Such other provisions as may be necessary or convenient.

Acts 1957, ch. 375, § 16; T.C.A., § 42-322.

42-5-203. Joint board.

Public agencies acting jointly pursuant to this part shall create a joint board, which shall consist of members appointed by the governing body of each participating public agency.

The number of members to be appointed, and the length of term and compensation, if any, shall be provided for in the joint agreement.

Each joint board shall organize, select officers for terms to be fixed by the agreement, and adopt and amend from time to time rules for its own procedure.

The joint board has the power to plan, acquire, establish, develop, construct, enlarge, improve, maintain, equip, operate, regulate, protect, and police any airport or air navigation facility or airport hazard or navigation easement to be jointly acquired, controlled and operated, and such board may exercise, on behalf of its constituent public agencies, all the powers of each with respect to the airport, air navigation facility, airport hazard, or navigation easement, subject to the limitations of § 42-5-204.

Acts 1957, ch. 375, § 16; T.C.A., § 42-323.

42-5-204. Limitations on joint board.

Expenditures. The total expenditures to be made by the joint board for any purpose in any fiscal year shall be determined by a budget approved by the governing bodies of its constituent public agencies on or before thirty (30) days preceding the first day of the fiscal year.

Acquisitions Beyond Sums Allotted. No airport, air navigation facility, airport hazard, avigation easement, or real or personal property, the cost of which is in excess of sums therefor fixed by the joint agreement or allotted in the annual budget, may be acquired by the joint board without the approval of the governing bodies of its constituent public agencies.

Eminent Domain. Eminent domain proceedings under this part may be instituted only by authority of the governing bodies of the constituent public agencies, which authority may be by resolution or ordinance; provided, that the joint board may, without such consent, enter into the contract, lease or other arrangements contemplated by § 42-5-110.

Disposal of Real Property. The joint board shall not dispose of any airport, air navigation facility, avigation easement, or real property under its jurisdiction except with the consent of the governing bodies of its constituent public agencies; provided, that the joint board may, without such consent, enter into the contract, lease or other arrangements contemplated by § 42-5-110.

Police Regulations. Any resolutions, rules, regulations or orders of the joint board regarding the subjects authorized by § 42-5-113 shall become effective only upon approval of the governing bodies of the constituent public agencies; provided, that upon approval, the resolutions, rules, regulations or orders of the joint board shall have the same force and effect in the territories or jurisdictions involved as the ordinances, resolutions, regulations, rules or orders of each public agency would have in its own territory or jurisdiction.

Acts 1957, ch. 375, § 16; T.C.A., § 42-324.

42-5-205. Joint fund.

For the purpose of providing a joint board with moneys for the necessary expenditures in carrying out this part, a joint fund shall be created and maintained, into which shall be deposited the share of each of the constituent public agencies as provided by the joint agreement.

Each of the constituent public agencies shall provide its share of the fund from sources available to each.

Any federal, state or other contributions or loans, and the revenues obtained from the joint ownership, control and operation of any airport or air navigation facility under the jurisdiction of the joint board shall be paid into the joint fund.

Disbursements from the fund shall be made by order of the board, subject to the limitations prescribed in § 42-5-204.

Acts 1957, ch. 375, § 16; T.C.A., § 42-325.